test/src/morphology/N-kraemp_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - krämp: # Noun 63 'eng /est kramp/fin' - full paradigm
     krämp+N+Sg+Nom: krämp
     krämp+N+Sg+Gen: krämp
     krämp+N+Sg+Par: krämpõ
     krämp+N+Sg+Dat: krämpõn
     krämp+N+Sg+Ins: krämpõks
     krämp+N+Sg+Ill: krämpõ
     krämp+N+Sg+Ela: krämpstõ
     krämp+N+Pl+Nom: krǟmpid
     krämp+N+Pl+Gen: krǟmpid
     krämp+N+Pl+Par: krǟmpidi
     krämp+N+Pl+Dat: krǟmpidõn
     krämp+N+Pl+Ins: krǟmpidõks
     krämp+N+Pl+Ill: krǟmpiž
     krämp+N+Pl+Ela: krǟmpist
